pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Sport > Akcesoria sędziowskie: Opaski dla kapitanów drużyn; Materiały i narzędzia do oznaczania granic boisk i kortów; Monety i żetony do rzucania; Flagi sędziowskie; Kartki i flagi karne; Liczniki rzutów miotacza; Stanowiska i krzesła sędziowskie; Etui na kartki sędziowskie; Akcesoria do tablic wyników; Tablice wyników; Gwizdki sędziowskie; Liczniki sędziowskie
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Šport > Trenerstvo in sodništvo: Kapetanski trakovi; Mejne oznake polja in igrišča; Igralni kovanci in ploščki; Sodniške zastavice; Kazenski kartoni in zastavice; Števci metov; Sodniška stojala in stoli; Sodniške denarnice; Dodatki za semaforje; Rezultatske table; Športne in varnostne piščalke; Indikatorji za sodnike
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания > Треньорство и съдийство: Капитански ленти; Означения за граници на полето и корта; Хвърляне на монети и дискове; Съдийски флагове; Наказателни картончета и флагове; Механични броячи; Стойки и столове за съдии; Портфейли за съдии; Аксесоари за табло за резултати; Табла за резултат; Спортни и сигнални свирки; Индикатори за арбитри
ko: 스포츠용품 > 운동 > 코치/심판 용품: 주장 완장; 운동장/코트 경계 마커; 플립 코인/디스크; 진행용 깃발; 페널티 카드/깃발; 투구수 카운터기; 심판용 스탠드/의자; 심판용 지갑; 점수판 액세서리; 득점판; 스포츠/안전용 호루라기; 심판 카운터기
fr: Équipements sportifs > Divers sports > Accessoires d'entraînement et d'arbitrage: Brassards de capitaine; Marquage des lignes de terrains et courts; Pièces ou pions pile ou face; Drapeaux d'arbitre; Cartons et drapeaux d'arbitrage; Compteurs de lancers; Chaises et plateformes d’arbitrage; Portefeuilles d'arbitrage; Accessoires de tableaux d'affichage; Tableaux de score; Sifflets de sport et de sécurité; Compteurs pour arbitres
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Atletika > Treniranje i suđenje: Kapetanske narukvice; Oznake za granice terena i igrališta; Novčići i žetoni za bacanje; Sudačke zastavice; Kazneni kartoni i zastavice; Brojač bacanja; Sudačke klupe i stolice; Sudački novčanici; Dodaci za sportske semafore; Sportski semafori; Sportske i sigurnosne zviždaljke; Indikatori za suca
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Urheilu > Valmennus ja tuomarointi: Kapteenin nauhat; Kentän rajamerkintä; Tuomarin kolikot ja levyt; Viralliset liput; Varoituskortit ja -liput; Käsilaskurit; Tuomarikorokkeet ja -tuolit; Tuomarin lompakot; Tulostaulujen lisävarusteet; Tulostaulut; Pillit; Tuomarilaskurit
hu: Sportszerek > Atlétika > Edzés és játékvezetés: Kapitánykarszalagok; Mező- és udvari határjelzők; Feldobóérmék és -lemezek; Játékvezető zászlók; Büntetőkártyák és -zászlók; Dobásszámlálók; Játékvezetői állványok és székek; Játékvezetői tárcák; Eredményjelző-kiegészítők; Eredménytáblák; Sport- és biztonsági sípok; Játékvezetői jelzők
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Spor Ekipmanları > Koçluk ve Hakemlik: Kaptanlık Pazu Bantları; Saha ve Kort Sınırı Çizme Araçları; Yazı-Tura Paraları ve Diskleri; Hakem Bayrakları; Penaltı Kartları ve Bayrakları; Atış Sayaçları; Hakem Stantları ve Sandalyeleri; Hakem Cüzdanları; Skorbord aksesuarları; Skorbordlar; Hakem ve Koç Düdükleri; Hakem Sayaçları
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Điền kinh > Huấn luyện thể dục thể thao: Băng tay đội trưởng; Dụng cụ đánh dấu đường biên sân thể thao; Búng xu và đĩa; Cờ phát lệnh; Thẻ phạt và cờ; Máy đếm cú ném; Chỗ đứng và ghế trọng tài; Ví thẻ trọng tài; Phụ kiện bảng điểm; Bảng tỉ số; Còi thể thao và còi cứu hộ; Bảng thông báo của trọng tài
nl: Sportartikelen > Lichaamssporten > Coachen en scheidsrechteren: Aanvoerdersbanden; Veld- en baanmarkeringen; Tossmunten; Scheidsrechtervlaggen; Strafkaarten en -vlaggen; Pitchtellers; Scheidsrechterstoelen; Scheidsrechtersmapjes; Accessoires voor scoreborden; Scoreborden; Coach- en scheidsrechterfluiten; Indicators voor scheidsrechters
it: Articoli sportivi > Sport > Arbitraggio e allenamento: Fasce da capitano; Strumenti segnacampo per sport; Monete e dischi per arbitri; Bandiere arbitrali; Cartellini e bandierine; Contatori per lanci; Sedie per arbitri; Portafogli per arbitri; Accessori per tabelloni segnapunti; Tabelloni segnapunti; Fischietti per arbitri e allenatori; Contastrike
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividade desportiva > Itens para treinadores e árbitros: Braçadeiras de capitão; Delimitadores de campo; Discos e moedas para lançamento; Bandeiras para árbitro; Bandeiras e cartões de faltas; Contadores de arremessos; Cadeiras e plataformas para árbitro; Carteiras para árbitro; Acessórios para marcadores; Placares; Apitos de segurança e desporto; Indicadores para árbitro
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friidrett > Dømming: Kapteinarmbånd; Banemarkører; Kastemynter og -skiver; Dommerflagg; Dommerkort og -flagg; Banetellere; Dommerbur og -stoler; Dommerbøker; Tilbehør til resultattavler; Poengtavler; Sports- og sikkerhetsfløyter; Umpire-indikator
da: Sportsartikler > Atletik > Dommerudstyr: Anførerarmbånd; Banemarkører; Plat og krone-mønter og -skiver; Officierende flag; Dommerkort og -flag; Kasttællere; Dommertårne og -stole; Dommermapper; Tilbehør til måltavler; Pointtavler; Dommerfløjter; Dommerflag
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Atletika > Treniravimas ir sporto administravimas: Kapitonų rankų raiščiai; Aikštelių ir kortų ribų žymekliai; Metamos monetos ir diskai; Teisėjų vėliavėlės; Baudos kortelės ir vėliavėlės; Metimų skaitikliai; Teisėjų stovai ir kėdės; Teisėjų planšetės; Rezultatų lentų priedai; Rezultatų lentelės; Sporto ir saugos švilpukai; Teisėjų indikatoriai
de: Sportartikel > Athletik > Trainer- & Schiedsrichterausrüstung: Kapitänsbinden; Begrenzungsmarkierungen für Spielfelder; Schiedsrichter-Münzen; Schiedsrichterfahnen; Strafkarten & -flaggen; Pitch Counter; Schiedsrichterstände & -stühle; Schiedsrichtermappen; Zubehör für Anzeigetafeln; Anzeigetafeln; Schiedsrichter- & Trainerpfeifen; Handzähler
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 田径 > 教练与裁判用品: 队长袖标; 场地/球场边界标记; 翻转硬币和圆盘; 裁判旗; 红黄牌/裁判旗; 投球计数器; 裁判台/裁判椅; 裁判工具皮夹; 记分牌配件; 记分板; 运动/安全哨; 裁判员指示器
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Atletika > Koučovanie a organizácia športového podujatia: Kapitánske pásky; Vymedzovacie značky ihriska a kurtu; Losovacie mince a terčíkové panely; Rozhodcovské vlajky; Trestné karty a vlajky; Zápasové počítadlá; Stojany a stoličky pre rozhodcu; Peňaženky pre rozhodcov; Príslušenstvo pre výsledkové tabule; Výsledkové tabule; Športové a bezpečnostné píšťalky; Ovládače pre rozhodcov
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Atletické sporty > Potřeby pro trenéry a rozhodčí: Kapitánské pásky; Značení hranic hřiště; Losovací mince; Vlajky/praporky pro rozhodčí; Penaltové karty a praporky; Počítadla nadhozů; Sedačky pro rozhodčí; Pouzdra na karty pro rozhodčí; Příslušenství k výsledkovým tabulím; Výsledkové tabule; Píšťalky pro rozhodčí; Ukazatele skóre pro hlavního rozhodčího
sv: Sportartiklar > Idrott och sport > Domarutrustning: Armband för lagkaptener; Gränsmarkörer för sport- och idrottsplaner; Slantsingling; Domarflaggor; Utvisningskort; Slagräknare; Domarstolar; Domarpåsar; Tillbehör för poängtavlor; Poängtavlor; Domarvisslor; Slag- och kasträknare för domare
ja: スポーツ用品 > スポーツ競技 > 指導者・審判向け用品: キャプテンマーク; フィールド・コート用境界マーカー; トス用コイン・ディスク; 審判用旗; ペナルティカード・フラッグ; ピッチ計; 審判台・審判椅子; 審判用カードケース; スコアボードアクセサリー; スコアボード; 審判用ホイッスル; 審判用インジケーター
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 競技體育 > 教練和裁判用具: 隊長袖標; 球場界線標記工具; 投擲硬幣; 主旗; 裁判用警告牌/警告旗; 投球計數器; 裁判椅; 裁判皮套; 計分板配件; 計分板; 運動安全用哨; 裁判計數器
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Atletism > Antrenamente și prezentare: Banderole căpitani; Elemente de delimitare pentru teren; Monede și discuri; Steaguri de prezentare; Cartonașe și steaguri penalti; Numărător ture; Standuri și scaune pentru arbitri; Portofele arbitri; Accesorii pentru tabele de marcaj; Tabele de marcaj; Fluiere sportive și de siguranță; Indicatori arbitru
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Equipamiento para atletismo > Accesorios para árbitros: Brazaletes para capitán; Marcadores de límites para pistas y campos; Monedas y discos para sorteo de campo; Banderas de arbitraje; Tarjetas de arbitraje; Contadores de béisbol; Sillas y plataformas para árbitros; Carteras para árbitros; Accesorios para marcadores; Tableros marcador; Silbatos para árbitros; Indicadores para árbitros de béisbol
en: Sporting Goods > Athletics > Coaching & Officiating: Captains Armbands; Field & Court Boundary Markers; Flip Coins & Discs; Officiating Flags; Penalty Cards & Flags; Pitch Counters; Referee Stands & Chairs; Referee Wallets; Scoreboard Accessories; Scoreboards; Sport & Safety Whistles; Umpire Indicators
ru: Спортивные товары > Соревновательный спорт > Товары для тренеров и судей: Капитанские повязки; Товары для разметки полей и площадок; Монеты и диски для подбрасывания; Судейские флажки; Штрафные карточки и флажки; Механические счетчики; Судейские вышки и кресла; Судейские бумажники; Аксессуары для табло; Спортивные табло; Свистки для судей и тренеров; Бейсбольные счетчики
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > การกีฬา > การโค้ชและการกำกับ: ปลอกแขนกัปตัน; เครื่องทำขอบเขตสำหรับสนามและคอร์ด; ลูกเต๋าหรือเหรียญเสี่ยงทาย; ธงผู้ตัดสิน; การ์ดและธงทำโทษ; ตัวนับการขว้าง; สแตนและเก้าอี้ของกรรมการ; สมุดจดของกรรมการ; อุปกรณ์เสริมสำหรับป้ายคะแนน; ป้ายคะแนน; นกหวีดสำหรับกีฬาและความปลอดภัย; สัญลักษณ์ผู้ตัดสิน
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Αθλητισμός > Προπονητική & διαιτησία: Περιβραχιόνια αρχηγών; Σημάνσεις ορίων γηπέδων; Νομίσματα & δίσκοι για κλήρωση; Σημαίες διαιτησίας; Κάρτες & σημαίες ποινών; Μετρητές ρίψεων; Βάσεις & καρέκλες διαιτητών; Πορτοφόλια διαιτητών; Αξεσουάρ πινάκων αποτελεσμάτων; Πίνακες σκορ; Σφυρίχτρες αθλητισμού και ασφάλειας; Διατάξεις ένδειξης για διαιτητές
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Artigos para prática de esportes > Treinamento e arbitragem: Braçadeiras de capitão; Marcadores de limite para campos e quadras; Moedas e discos; Bandeiras oficiais; Cartões e bandeiras de penalidade; Contadores de arremessos; Cadeiras para árbitro; Carteiras para árbitro; Acessórios para placares; Placares; Apitos de arbitragem e treinamento; Indicadores para árbitro de beisebol